Arkansas statutes. Title 21 Public Officers and Employees
Chapter 8 Ethics and Conflicts of Interest
21-8-601. Registration required — Exceptions — Termination.

A lobbyist shall register within five (5) days after beginning lobbying. Such registration shall be on forms provided by the Secretary of State containing the following information:

The name, address, and telephone number of the lobbyist;

The calendar year for which the lobbyist is registering;

The types of public servants being lobbied;

The name, address, and telephone number of the lobbyist's client or employer;

A description of the nature of the lobbyist's client or employer; and

Certification by the lobbyist that the information contained on the lobbyist registration form is true and correct.

Except as provided in subdivision (a)(2)(B) of this section, if there is a change of information during the registration period, a lobbyist shall file an amended registration form within ten (10) days of the change.

A lobbyist registered to lobby members of the General Assembly shall file an amended registration form within three (3) business days of a change of information that occurs during a regular or extraordinary session of the General Assembly.

A lobbyist shall not be required to register if he or she engages in no lobbying other than the following activities:

The publishing or broadcasting, by news media executives or their employees or agents, in the ordinary course of business, of news items, editorials, or other comments or paid advertisements which directly or indirectly urge legislative action or administrative action;

Engaging in lobbying exclusively on behalf of an Arkansas church which qualifies as a tax-exempt organization under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code when lobbying solely for the purpose of protecting the rights of members or adherents to practice the religious doctrines of the church;

Action in a person's official capacity as a public servant.

However, a public servant shall be required to register as a lobbyist if he or she:

Receives income from a nongovernmental person in excess of four hundred dollars ($400) in a quarter for lobbying; or

Expends or is reimbursed in excess of four hundred dollars ($400), regardless of the source, in a quarter for lobbying, excluding the cost of informational material and personal travel, lodging, meals, and dues;

State the registered lobbyist's name;

State the date the registered lobbyist's employment is terminated or his or her designation as a lobbyist terminated; and

Report any activity to be reported during the period in which the registration was in effect that has not already been reported.

Each registered lobbyist whose employment or designation as a lobbyist has not terminated shall reregister by January 15 of each year.

Amendments. The 2001 amendment added the last sentence in (a)(1); added (a)(1)(A) through (a)(1)(E); substituted “four hundred dollars $(400)” for “two hundred fifty dollars ($250)” in (a)(2)(C)(ii)(a), (a)(2)(C)(ii)(b) and (a)(2)(H); added the last sentence to (b); and added (b)(1) through (b)(3).

The 2005 amendment inserted present (a)(1)(C) and (a)(2); and redesignated former (a)(1)(C)-(E), (a)(2) and (a)(3) as present (a)(1)(D)-(F), (a)(3) and (a)(4).

The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (a)(3)(F).

U.S. Code. Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, referred to in this section, is codified as 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3).

Cross References. Preparation of General Assembly bills, resolutions, and amendments, §10-2-501.

ALR.

Validity, Construction, and Application of State and Municipal Enactments Regulating Lobbying and of Lobbying Contracts. 35 A.L.R.6th 1.

U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev.

Survey of Legislation, 2005 Arkansas General Assembly, Election Law, 28 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 351.

A lobbyist who lobbies public servants of a governmental body covering a district which includes all or part of more than one (1) county shall file with the Secretary of State and the county clerk of his or her principal place of business or residence within the state.

A lobbyist who would be required to register and file with more than one (1) public official under this section may, in lieu of registering with each public official, register and make other filings with the Secretary of State and the county clerk of his or her principal place of business or residence within the state.

ALR.

Validity, Construction, and Application of State and Municipal Enactments Regulating Lobbying and of Lobbying Contracts. 35 A.L.R.6th 1.

Is signed by a registered lobbyist under penalty of perjury under § 5-53-102; and

Certifies that the lobbyist activity report is accurate.

Amendments. The 1999 amendment, in (a)(2)(A), substituted “A” for “In addition to the quarterly lobbyist activity report, a” and added the last sentence.

The 2009 amendment added the (b)(1) designation; and added (b)(2) and (c).

ALR.

Validity, Construction, and Application of State and Municipal Enactments Regulating Lobbying and of Lobbying Contracts. 35 A.L.R.6th 1.

These totals shall be itemized according to financial category and employers and clients, including food and refreshments, entertainment, living accommodations, advertising, printing, postage, travel, telephone, and other expenses or services.

Registered lobbyists shall not be required to report office expenses other than office expenses specifically required to be reported under this section.

Registered lobbyists are not required to report unreimbursed personal living and travel expenses not incurred directly for lobbying;

(A)An itemized listing of each:

Gift given to a public servant or on behalf of the public servant;

Payment for food, lodging, or travel in excess of forty dollars ($40.00) on behalf of a public servant; and

Any other item paid or given to a public servant or on behalf of the public servant, except for campaign contributions, having a value in excess of forty dollars ($40.00) unless consideration of equal or greater value has been given therefor. If the person receiving or to be benefited by the item is a public employee, the person's governmental body shall be identified.

Each item shall be identified by date, amount paid or value, and the name of the individual receiving or to be benefited by the item, and a description of the item.

In the case of special events, including parties, dinners, athletic events, entertainment, and other functions, expenses need not be allocated by individuals. The information reported for a special event shall include:

The date of the event;

The name of the event;

The location of the event;

The name of the governmental body or group of public servants invited;

The exact amount paid by the lobbyist toward the total expenditure; and

The name of the lobbyist's employer or client making the expenditure and the names of all other lobbyists sharing in the cost of the payment;

A detailed statement of any money loaned or promised or line of credit established to a public servant or to anyone on behalf of the public servant in excess of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) per individual. Money loaned or a line of credit established that is issued in the ordinary course of business by a financial institution or a person who regularly and customarily extends credit shall not be required to be disclosed; and

A statement detailing the direct business association or partnership with any public servant before whom the lobbyist may engage in lobbying.

Amendments. The 1999 amendment, in (b)(1)(A), inserted “or any officer, employee, or agent”; substituted “forty dollars ($40.00)” for “twenty-five dollars ($25.00)” in (b)(2)(A)(ii) and (b)(2)(A)(iii); and added the last sentence in (b)(2)(A)(iii).

The 2001 amendment, in (b)(2)(C), deleted “but the date of the event, location, name of the governmental body or groups of public servants invited, and total expense shall be stated” following “by individuals” and added the last sentence; and added (b)(2)(C)(i) through (b)(2)(C)(vi).

ALR.

Validity, Construction, and Application of State and Municipal Enactments Regulating Lobbying and of Lobbying Contracts. 35 A.L.R.6th 1.

Drafting legislation;

Appearing in:

A judicial proceeding;

A proceeding or hearing if the appearance is a matter of public record; or

Any hearing or appeal proceeding conducted pursuant to the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, §25-15-201 et seq.;

Assisting an executive agency, at the written request of the agency, in drafting administrative rules or in publicizing or assisting in the implementation of final administrative actions;

Testifying as an individual at a public hearing in support of or in opposition to legislation or administrative action, testifying on behalf of a corporation, partnership, association, or other organization with which the person is regularly associated as an employee, officer, member, or partner, or testifying at the request of a legislative committee; or

Actions by contractors or employees of contractors while engaged in selling to a governmental body by demonstrating or describing commodities or services or inquiring as to specifications or terms and conditions of a particular purchase unless such contractor or its employees expend in excess of four hundred dollars ($400) in a calendar quarter for food, lodging, travel, or gifts to benefit public servants who purchase commodities or services on behalf of a governmental body.

A person whose only act of lobbying is to compensate or reimburse a registered lobbyist in the person's behalf shall not be required to register as a lobbyist.

Upon the termination of a registered lobbyist's employment or designation as a lobbyist, the termination shall be conveyed by the registered lobbyist in writing to the public official with whom the lobbyist is registered. The written notice of termination shall:

History.

Init. Meas. 1988, No. 1, § 1; Acts 1989, No. 719, § 2; 2001, No. 1839, § 27; 2005, No. 1284, § 14; 2019, No. 315, § 2332.

21-8-602. Other filings required.

A lobbyist who lobbies public servants of state government shall register and make other filings with the Secretary of State.

A lobbyist who lobbies public servants of municipal government shall register and make other filings with the city clerk or recorder of the municipality, as the case may be.

A lobbyist who lobbies public servants of county government or any government body not otherwise covered by this section shall register and make other filings with the county clerk of the county.

History.

Init. Meas. 1988, No. 1, § 1; Acts 1989, No. 719, § 2.

21-8-603. Activity reports — Inspection.

(1)Within fifteen (15) days after the end of each calendar quarter, each registered lobbyist shall file a complete and detailed statement, signed and sworn to, concerning his or her lobbying activities during the previous calendar quarter.

(A)A registered lobbyist who lobbies members of the General Assembly shall file a monthly lobbyist activity report, signed and sworn to, for any month in which the General Assembly is in session. A quarterly report is not required if the registered lobbyist has filed monthly lobbyist activity reports for each month of the calendar quarter.

The monthly lobbyist activity report shall be filed within ten (10) days after the end of each month.

(1)Lobbyist activity reports shall be open to public inspection.

Beginning January 1, 2010, all lobbyist activity reports that are required to be filed with the Secretary of State shall be filed in electronic form through the Internet.

The Secretary of State shall provide a form to be filed simultaneously with the lobbyist activity report that:

History.

Init. Meas. 1988, No. 1, § 1; Acts 1989, No. 719, § 2; 1999, No. 553, § 38; 2009, No. 963, § 1.

21-8-604. Activity reports — Required contents.

The lobbyist activity reports shall be signed and sworn to by the registered lobbyist.

The reports shall contain:

(A)The total of all expenditures made or incurred by the registered lobbyist or on behalf of the registered lobbyist by his or her employer or any officer, employee, or agent during the preceding period.

Whenever the name of a public servant will appear in an activity report of a lobbyist, the lobbyist shall notify the public servant and provide him or her the information being reported. The lobbyist shall mail or deliver the notification to the public servant not later than seven (7) working days prior to the date for filing the activity report.

History.

Init. Meas. 1988, No. 1, § 1; Acts 1989, No. 719, § 2; 1997, No. 114, § 1; 1999, No. 553, § 39; 2001, No. 1839, §§ 28, 34.

21-8-605. Records.

A registered lobbyist shall maintain and preserve all accounts, bills, receipts, and any other documents necessary to substantiate the financial reports required by this subchapter, §21-8-401 et seq., §21-8-701 et seq., and §21-8-801 et seq. for a period of at least four (4) years from the date of the filing of the statement or report.

History.

Init. Meas. 1988, No. 1, § 1; Acts 1989, No. 719, § 2; 1999, No. 553, § 40.

Amendments. The 1999 amendment deleted “5” following “subchapters 4” and substituted “four (4) years” for “three (3) years.”

21-8-606. Duties of public officials.

The Secretary of State, each county clerk, and each city clerk or recorder shall:

Provide forms approved by the Arkansas Ethics Commission for registration and for statements required by this subchapter, § 21-8-401 et seq., § 21-8-701 et seq., and § 21-8-801 et seq. to all persons required to file; and

Make all statements and reports filed available for public inspection and copying at a reasonable cost during regular office hours.

Amendments. The 2001 amendment, in (1), deleted “4, 5 [repealed]” following “by subchapters” and added “and” to the end; deleted (2); and redesignated former (3) as present (2).

History.

Init. Meas. 1988, No. 1, § 1; Acts 1989, No. 719, § 2; Init. Meas. 1990, No. 1, § 7; 2001, No. 1839, § 29.

21-8-607. Prohibited acts.

No person shall purposely employ any lobbyist who is required to register as a registered lobbyist but is not registered pursuant to this chapter.

No person engaging in lobbying shall:

Influence or attempt to influence, by coercion, bribery, or threat of economic sanction, any public servant in the discharge of the duties of his or her office;

Purposely provide false information to any public servant as to any material fact pertaining to any legislative or administrative action;

Purposely omit, conceal, or falsify in any manner information required by the registration and lobbyist activity reports;

Contract to receive or accept compensation that is dependent in any manner upon:

The success or failure of a legislative or administrative action; or

The outcome of any executive, legislative, or administrative action relating to the solicitation or securing of a procurement contract; or

Provide payment for food or beverages at any location or event at which the lobbyist is not present physically.

Subdivision (b)(5)(A) of this section shall not apply to a special event under § 21-8-402(20).

A person convicted of violating subsection (a) or subsection (b) of this section is:

Prohibited from acting as a registered lobbyist for a period of three (3) years from the date of the conviction; and

Subject to a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) and not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

Any person violating the three-year ban shall be deemed guilty of an additional violation of this subchapter.

Any person who acts as a lobbyist as defined by § 21-8-402(11) but purposely fails to register within five (5) days of beginning lobbying activities as required by § 21-8-601 is subject to a fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) and not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

On a lobbyist registration form, a person acting as a lobbyist shall not:

Purposely provide false information; or

Purposely omit information.

A person who violates subdivision (e)(1) of this section shall:

Not be considered a registered lobbyist; and

Be subject to a fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) and not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

A person convicted of three (3) or more violations of a provision of this subchapter shall be permanently prohibited from acting as a registered lobbyist in this state.

An expunged record shall not serve as the basis for disqualification under this section.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment added (b)(4) and (b)(5); rewrote (c); and added (d) through (g).

Cross References. Arkansas Ethics Commission, §7-6-217.

Effective Dates. Init. Meas. 1988, No. 1, § 1: Jan. 1, 1989.

Acts 2001, No. 1839, § 35: became law without governor's signature. Approved Apr. 20, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly that various provisions of the Arkansas Code relating to campaign financing and ethics are vague or otherwise in need of modification; that this act accomplishes those purposes; and that this act should go into effect as soon as possible so that those persons who are subject to the provisions of the various ethics and campaign finance statutes receive the benefit of the clarifications as soon as possible. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2015, No. 999, § 5: Apr. 2, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the retention of certain public records such as campaign contribution reports and statements of financial interest filed by public officials warrants recognition, promotion, and protection by this state; that it is of vital importance that the state immediately designates an official custodian of these records so that the public can be assured that a designated state office will keep the records; and that this act is immediately necessary to ensure that the records will be available for immediate inspection. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2015, No. 1280, § 16: Apr. 8, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the people of Arkansas adopted Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 94, at the 2014 General Election, which added Sections 28, 29, and 30 to Article 19 of the Arkansas Constitution; that Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 94, requires the General Assembly to provide by law that Arkansas Constitution, Article 19, Sections 28, 29, and 30 be under the jurisdiction of the Arkansas Ethics Commission; that this act should become effective at the earliest opportunity to allow the commission to enforce Arkansas Constitution, Article 19, Sections 28, 29, and 30 and issue guidance to affected public officials; and that the additional provisions of this act provide clarity to the ethics laws of the State of Arkansas and should become effective at the earliest opportunity to prevent confusion and avoid incorrect applications of the state's ethics laws. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 4, § 8: May 29, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that independent candidates may circulate petitions for candidacy for ninety (90) days before the deadline for filing as a candidate for office; and that without an emergency clause, the effective date of this act will cause confusion regarding the rights and interests of independent candidates and the time period for circulating petitions for candidacy. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

U. Ark. Little Rock L.J.

Survey, Miscellaneous, 12 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 653.

A public official, as defined in § 21-8-402(17);

A candidate for elective office;

A district judge or city attorney, whether elected or appointed;

An agency head, department director, or division director of state government or a chief of staff or chief deputy of a constitutional officer, the Senate, or the House of Representatives;

A public appointee to a state board or commission that is authorized or charged by law with the exercise of regulatory authority or is authorized to receive or disburse state or federal funds.

A public appointee to a state board or commission that is not charged by law with the exercise of regulatory authority and that receives or disburses state or federal funds only in the form of mileage reimbursement for members attending meetings of the board or commission shall not be required to file a written statement of financial interest;

A person who is an elected member of a school board or who is a candidate for a position on a school board;

A public or charter school superintendent;

An executive director of an education service cooperative;

A person appointed to one (1) of the following types of regional, municipal, or county boards or commissions:

A planning board or commission;

An airport board or commission;

A water or sewer board or commission;

A utility board or commission; or

A civil service commission;

A member of an advertising and promotion commission; and

A member of a research park authority board under § 14-144-201 et seq.

If a person is included in any category listed in subsection (a) of this section for any part of a calendar year, then such person shall file a statement of financial interest covering that period of time regardless of whether the person has left his or her office or position as of the date that statement of financial interest is due.

Any incumbent officeholder who filed the statement of financial interest by January 31 of the year in which the election is held shall not be required to file an additional statement upon becoming a candidate for reelection or election to another office at any election held during the year.

The statement of financial interest shall include the following:

Employer and of each other source of gross income amounting to more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) annually received by the person or his or her spouse in his or her own name, or by any other person for the use or benefit of the public servant or candidate or his or her spouse, and a brief description of the nature of the services for which the compensation was received.

However, this subdivision (d)(3)(A) does not require the disclosure of individual items of income that constitute a portion of the gross income of the business or profession from which the public servant or candidate or his or her spouse derives income; and

Source of gross income as described in subdivision (d)(3)(A) of this section of more than twelve thousand five hundred dollars ($12,500).

However, this subdivision (d)(3)(B) does not require the disclosure of individual items of income that constitute a portion of the gross income of the business or profession from which the public servant or candidate or his or her spouse derives income;

Each source described in subdivision (d)(4)(A) of this section that has a fair market value of over twelve thousand five hundred dollars ($12,500) as of the last day of the previous calendar year shall also be identified;

Every office or directorship held by the public servant or candidate or his or her spouse in any business, corporation, firm, or enterprise subject to jurisdiction of a regulatory agency of this state or of any of its political subdivisions;

(A)The name and address of each creditor to whom the value of five thousand dollars ($5,000) or more was personally owed or personally obligated and is still outstanding by the public servant or candidate.

Loans made in the ordinary course of business by either a financial institution or a person who regularly and customarily extends credit shall not be required to be disclosed.

Debts owed to the members of the public servant's or candidate's family need not be included;

This requirement shall be applicable only to debt guaranties for debts assumed or arising after January 1, 1989.

Guaranteed debts existing prior to January 1, 1989, which are extended or refinanced shall become subject to disclosure in the annual financing statement due to be filed after the conclusion of the year in which such extension or refinancing occurred;

Any public servant who is employed by any business that is under direct regulation or subject to direct control by the governmental body which he or she serves shall set out this employment and the fact that the business is regulated by or subject to control of the governmental body on the statement of financial interest; and

If a public servant or any business in which he or she or his or her spouse is an officer, director, stockholder owning more than ten percent (10%) of the stock of the company, and the owner, trustee, or partner shall sell any goods or services having a total annual value in excess of one thousand dollars ($1,000) to the governmental body in which the public servant serves or is employed, then the public servant shall set out in detail the goods or services sold, the governmental body to which they were sold, and the compensation paid for each category of goods or services sold.

If the Arkansas Ethics Commission does not proceed with an investigation of an alleged error in a statement of financial interest under subdivision (f)(2)(A) of this section, the person shall not be considered to have committed a violation of the applicable statute.

This section shall not be construed to:

Remove the duty to file a statement of financial interest under this subchapter; or

Authorize a person to knowingly fail to file a statement of financial interest under this subchapter.

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1989, No. 719, § 3, provided, in part, that, for the financial statement required to be filed by January 31, 1989, this requirement shall apply only to gifts received after November 8, 1988.

Amendments. The 1999 amendment by No. 553 added (a)(6) and (7); rewrote (b) and (c); added (d)(2); redesignated former (d)(2)-(d)(10) as present (d)(3)-(d)(11), respectively; substituted “last day of the previous calendar year” for “date of the state” in (d)(4)(A); substituted “as of the last day of the previous calendar year” for “on the date of the statement” in (d)(4)(B); rewrote (d)(8); and made stylistic changes.

The 1999 amendment by No. 1172 added (a)(6) and (7).

The 2001 amendment by No. 1599 inserted (a)(7)-(8) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly.

The 2001 amendment by No. 1839 inserted “gross” preceding “income” twice in (d)(3); substituted “description and a reasonable estimate of the fair market value” for “reasonable fair market value, and” in (d)(8); added (d)(9) and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly; inserted “or she” in present (d)(11); and in present (d)(12), deleted “or” preceding “stockholder,” substituted “and the owner” for “the owner,” and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2005 amendment redesignated former (5) as present (5)(A); substituted “commission that” for “commission who” in present (5)(A); and added (5)(B).

The 2009 amendment by No. 473 inserted “and address” in (d)(4)(A).

The 2009 amendment by No. 963 added “or a chief of … House of Representatives” in (a)(4); and added (e).

The 2013 amendment by No. 88 rewrote (a)(6), (a)(7) and (a)(8); and added (a)(10) and (a)(11).

The 2013 amendment by No. 706 inserted present (d)(7) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly.

The 2015 amendment by No. 999 added (e)(2).

The 2015 amendment by No. 1151 rewrote (d)(3) and (4).

The 2015 amendment by No. 1280 added (f).

Ark. L. Notes.

Leflar, The Reform of Ethics Rules In Arkansas Government, 2000 Ark. L. Notes 65.

U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev.

Survey of Legislation, 2005 Arkansas General Assembly, Election Law, 28 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 351.

History.

Init. Meas. 1988, No. 1, § 1; Acts 1989, No. 719, § 2; 2009, No. 963, § 2.

Subchapter 7

— Disclosure by State and Local Officials — Statement of Financial Interest

21-8-701. Persons required to file — Exceptions — Contents.

The following persons shall file a written statement of financial interest:

A member of a levee district or a levee and drainage district or any candidate therefor shall not be required to file a written statement of financial interest under this section.

(1)(A)The statement of financial interest for the previous calendar year shall be filed by January 31 of each year, except that a candidate for elective office shall file the statement of financial interest for the previous calendar year on the first Monday following the close of the period to file as a candidate for the elective office, and persons identified in subdivisions (a)(4) and (5) of this section shall file the statement of financial interest within thirty (30) days after appointment or employment.

The name of the public servant or candidate and his or her spouse and all names under which they do business;

The reasons for filing the statement of financial interest;

Identification of each:

(A)The name and address of every business in which the public servant or candidate or his or her spouse, or any other person for the use or benefit of the public servant or candidate or his or her spouse, has an investment or holdings of over one thousand dollars ($1,000) at fair market value as of the last day of the previous calendar year.

The name and address of each governmental body to which the public servant or candidate is legally obligated to pay a past-due amount and a description of the nature and amount of the obligation;

(A)The name and address of each guarantor or co-maker, other than a member of the public servant's or candidate's family, who has guaranteed a debt of the public servant or candidate that is still outstanding.

The source, date, description, and a reasonable estimate of the fair market value of each gift of more than one hundred dollars ($100) received by the public servant or candidate or his or her spouse or more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) received by his or her dependent children;

Each monetary or other award of more than one hundred dollars ($100) received by the public servant or candidate in his or her capacity as an employee of a public school district, the Arkansas School for the Blind, the Arkansas School for the Deaf, the Arkansas School for Mathematics, Sciences, and the Arts, a university, a college, a technical college, a technical institute, a comprehensive life-long learning center, or a community college in recognition of his or her contribution to education;

Each nongovernmental source of payment of the public servant's expenses for food, lodging, or travel that bears a relationship to the public servant's office when the public servant is appearing in his or her official capacity when the expenses incurred exceed one hundred fifty dollars ($150). The public servant shall identify the name and business address of the person or organization paying the public servant's expenses and the date, nature, and amount of that expenditure if not compensated by the entity for which the public servant serves;

(1)All statements of financial interest required to be filed with the Secretary of State on or after January 1, 2010, shall be made publicly accessible at no charge by the Secretary of State in electronic form through the Internet.

The Secretary of State is the official custodian of the records of statements of financial interest that are filed with the Secretary of State under this section.

(1)It is an affirmative defense to prosecution or disciplinary action if a person required to file a statement of financial interest under this subchapter amends the statement of financial interest within thirty (30) days of discovering or learning of an unintentional error in the statement of financial interest.

(A)The Arkansas Ethics Commission shall not proceed with an investigation of an alleged error in a statement of financial interest filed under this subchapter if the Arkansas Ethics Commission determines that a person would be eligible to raise the affirmative defense under subdivision (f)(1) of this section.

History.

Init. Meas. 1988, No. 1, § 1; Acts 1989, No. 719, § 3; 1991, No. 240, § 1; 1999, No. 553, §§ 41-44; 1999, No. 1172, § 1; 2001, No. 1599, § 22; 2001, No. 1839, § 30; 2005, No. 1284, § 15; 2007, No. 221, § 17; 2007, No. 267, § 1; 2007, No. 617, § 42; 2009, No. 473, § 13; 2009, No. 963, §§ 3, 4; 2013, No. 88, § 1; 2013, No. 706, § 1; 2015, No. 999, § 3; 2015, No. 1151, § 2; 2015, No. 1280, § 13.

21-8-702. Forms.

Forms used by persons in filing statements as required in this subchapter shall provide for the signature of the person, under penalty of false swearing, with respect to the truth and accuracy of the statements made on the form.

History.

Init. Meas. 1988, No. 1, § 1; Acts 1989, No. 719, § 3; 1999, No. 553, § 45.

Amendments. The 1999 amendment substituted “false swearing” for “perjury.”

21-8-703. Place and manner of filing.

The statement of financial interest shall be filed as follows:

State or district public servants and candidates for state or district public office required to file shall file with the Secretary of State;

County, township, or school district public servants and candidates for county, township, or school district public office required to file shall file with the county clerks;

Municipal public servants and candidates for municipal office required to file shall file with the city clerk or recorder, as the case may be;

All city attorneys, whether elected or appointed, shall file with the city clerk of the municipality within which they serve;

Members of regional boards or commissions shall file with the county clerk of the county in which they reside; and

District judges shall file with the Secretary of State.

Any report required by this subchapter shall be deemed timely filed if it is:

Hand-delivered to the appropriate public official on or before the date due;

Mailed to the appropriate public official, properly addressed, postage prepaid, bearing a postmark indicating that it was received by the post office or common carrier on or before the date due;

Received via facsimile by the appropriate public official on or before the date due, provided the original is received by the appropriate public official within ten (10) days of the transmission; or

Received by the appropriate public official in a readable electronic format which is acceptable to such public official and approved by the Arkansas Ethics Commission.

Amendments. The 1999 amendment inserted “and manner” in the section catchline; added (b); and made stylistic changes.

The 2001 amendment inserted “and candidates for state or district public office” in (a)(1); inserted “and … office” in (a)(2); inserted “and candidates for municipal office” in (a)(3); added “and” to the end of (a)(4); added (a)(5); substituted “appropriate public official” for “Secretary of State” throughout (b); and substituted “such public official” for “the Secretary of State” in (b)(4).

The 2013 amendment deleted “district judges or” preceding “city” in (a)(4); and added (a)(6).

The 2017 amendment substituted “Secretary of State” for “county clerk” in (a)(6).

History.

Acts 1989, No. 719, § 3; 1999, No. 553, § 46; 2001, No. 1839, § 31; 2013, No. 475, § 1; 2017, No. 721, § 11.

21-8-704. Filing by persons called to active duty — Exceptions.

If a person who is required to file a statement of financial interest under this subchapter is called to active duty in the United States Armed Forces:

The person shall be allowed an additional one hundred eighty (180) days to file the statement of financial interest required by this subchapter; and

The statement of financial interest may be completed by the spouse of the person. If the statement of financial interest is completed by the spouse of the person, the spouse's signature shall be sufficient for the requirement of § 21-8-702.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 472, § 1.

21-8-705. Filing of additional statement of financial interest in year in which party filing period is held. [Expires December 31, 2016.]

If the party filing period under §7-7-203 ends before January 1 of the year of the general election, a candidate for elective office shall file a statement of financial interest for the previous calendar year no later than January 31 of the year of the general election in addition to the statement of financial interest required under §21-8-701.

History.

Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 4, § 5.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 4, § 6, provided:

“(a)To ensure that independent candidates are provided the maximum number of days allowed by law to circulate petitions to qualify as an independent candidate, the provisions of this act are retroactive to August 1, 2015.

“(b)Signatures on a petition to have the name of a person placed upon the ballot as an independent candidate under §7-7-103 collected between August 11, 2015, and the effective date of this act shall be counted if:

“(1)The signatures are not otherwise collected in violation of Arkansas law;

“(2)The signatures otherwise comply with applicable Arkansas law; and

“(3)The petition is lawfully filed.”

Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 4, § 7, provided:

“(a)This act is cumulative of existing laws and shall not repeal but merely suspend any law in conflict with the act.

“(b)The provisions of this act are temporary and expire on December 31, 2016.

“(c)On and after December 31, 2016, the provisions of law suspended by this act shall be in full force and effect.

“(d)The expiration of this act shall not affect rights acquired under it or affect suits then pending.”